Utah statutes.
32B-6-707.   Application of part to other retail license type.

(1)  A retail licensee who is not an on-premise beer retailer, but who sells, offers for sale, or furnishes beer pursuant to a different part under this chapter:

(a)  may sell, offer for sale, or furnish beer without obtaining a separate on-premise beer retailer license from the commission; and

(b)  shall comply with the operational requirements under this part that apply to an on-premise beer retailer, except when a requirement of this part is inconsistent with or less restrictive than an operational requirement under the relevant part under this chapter for the type of retail license.

(2)  Failure of a retail licensee or staff of the retail licensee to comply with a requirement of this part may result in disciplinary action in accordance with Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act, against:

(a)  a retail licensee;

(b)  individual staff of a retail licensee; or

(c)  both a retail licensee and staff of the retail licensee.

